Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1458.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. REPEALER 22 O.S. 2021, Section 384, is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective in accordance with
the provisions of Section 58 of Article V of the Oklahoma
Constitution.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
February 17, 2026 - DO PASS






SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1458 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)